Utah statutes.
53-10-606.   Committee to report annually.
(1)  The committee shall submit an annual report to the Executive
Appropriations Committee of the Legislature which shall include:
(a)  the total aggregate surcharge collected by local entities and the state
in the last fiscal year under Sections 69-2-5 and 69-2-5.6;
(b)  the amount of each disbursement from the fund;
(c)  the recipient of each disbursement and describing the project for which
money was disbursed;
(d)  the conditions, if any, placed by the committee on disbursements from the
fund;
(e)  the planned expenditures from the fund for the next fiscal year;
(f)  the amount of any unexpended funds carried forward;
(g)  a cost study to guide the Legislature towards necessary adjustments of
both the Statewide Unified E-911 Emergency Service Fund and the monthly
emergency services telephone charge imposed under Section 69-2-5; and
(h)  a progress report of local government implementation of wireless and
land-based E-911 services including:
(i)  a fund balance or balance sheet from each agency maintaining its own
emergency telephone service fund;
(ii)  a report from each public safety answering point of annual call activity
separating wireless and land-based 911 call volumes; and
(iii)  other relevant justification for ongoing support from the Statewide
Unified E-911 Emergency Service Fund.
(2) (a)  The committee may request information from a local entity as
necessary to prepare the report required by this section.
(b)  A local entity imposing a levy under Section 69-2-5 or receiving a grant
under Section 53-10-605 shall provide the information requested pursuant to
Subsection (2)(a).
